src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON вся
+Fem+Sg+Nom:ся́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:сю́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:се́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:се́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:се́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins:се́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:се́ю # ;

LEXICON все_anim
+Pl+Nom:се́ # ;
+Anim+Pl+Acc:се́х # ;
+Pl+Gen:се́х # ;
+Pl+Loc:се́х # ;
+Pl+Dat:се́м # ;
+Pl+Ins:се́ми # ;

LEXICON мс_этот
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:от # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:им # ;

LEXICON мс_это
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:о # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:о # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:им # ;

LEXICON мс_эти ! TODO CHECK FIX can this be inanimate too?
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:и # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:их # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Gen:их # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Loc:их # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Dat:им # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Ins:ими # ;

LEXICON мс_тот
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Nom:о́т # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:о́т # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
+Pron+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;

LEXICON мс_то
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:о́ # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:о́ # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
+Pron+Dem+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;

LEXICON мс_те
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Nom:е́ # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:е́х # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Gen:е́х # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Loc:е́х # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Dat:е́м # ;
+Pron+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Ins:е́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_один
+Det: один ;

LEXICON один
+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:%>ого́ # ;
+Msc+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
+Msc+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
+Msc+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
+Msc+Sg+Ins:%>и́м # ;
+Neu+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Gen:%>ого́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Loc:%>о́м # ;
+Neu+Sg+Dat:%>ому́ # ;
+Neu+Sg+Ins:%>и́м # ;
+Fem+Sg+Nom:%>а́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Acc:%>у́ # ;
+Fem+Sg+Gen:%>о́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Loc:%>о́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Dat:%>о́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins:%>о́й # ;
+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:%>о́ю # ;
+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>и́ # ;
+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>и́ # ;
+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>и́х # ;
+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>и́х # ;
+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>и́х # ;
+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>и́м # ;
+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>и́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_сам
+Det+Msc+Sg+Nom: # ;
+Det+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc: # ;
+Det+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого́ # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Nom:о́ # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Acc:о́ # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Nom:а́ # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Acc:у́ # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Gen:о́й # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Loc:о́й # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Dat:о́й # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Ins:о́й # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:о́ю # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Nom:и # ;
+Det+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:и # ;
+Det+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:и́х # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Gen:и́х # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Loc:и́х # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Dat:и́м # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Ins:и́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_сей
+Det+Msc+Sg+Nom:е́й # ;
+Det+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:е́й # ;
+Det+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:его́ # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Gen:его́ # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Loc:ём # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Dat:ему́ # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Nom:ие́ # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Acc:ие́ # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Gen:его́ # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Loc:ём # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Dat:ему́ # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Ins:и́м # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Nom:ия́ # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Acc:ию́ # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Gen:е́й # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Loc:е́й # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Dat:е́й # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Ins:е́й # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:е́ю # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Nom:ии́ # ;
+Det+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:ии́ # ;
+Det+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:и́х # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Gen:и́х # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Loc:и́х # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Dat:и́м # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Ins:и́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_тот
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Nom:о́т # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:о́т # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого́ # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Nom:о́ # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Acc:о́ # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Gen:ого́ # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Loc:о́м # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Dat:ому́ # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Ins:е́м # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom:а́ # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Acc:у́ # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Gen:о́й # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Loc:о́й # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Dat:о́й # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Ins:о́й # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:о́ю # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Nom:е́ # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:е́ # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:е́х # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Gen:е́х # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Loc:е́х # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Dat:е́м # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Ins:е́ми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_тот-то
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Nom:о́т-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:о́т-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Gen:ого́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Loc:о́м-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Dat:ому́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Ins:е́м-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Nom:о́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Acc:о́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Gen:ого́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Loc:о́м-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Dat:ому́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Ins:е́м-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom:а́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Acc:у́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Gen:о́й-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Loc:о́й-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Dat:о́й-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Ins:о́й-то # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Ins+Fac:о́ю-то # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Nom:е́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:е́-то # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:е́х-то # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Gen:е́х-то # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Loc:е́х-то # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Dat:е́м-то # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Ins:е́ми-то # ;

LEXICON мс-п_этот
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Nom:от # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:от # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:ого # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
+Det+Dem+Msc+Sg+Ins:им # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Nom:о # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Acc:о # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Gen:ого # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Loc:ом # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Dat:ому # ;
+Det+Dem+Neu+Sg+Ins:им # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Nom:а # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Acc:у # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Gen:ой # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Loc:ой # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Dat:ой # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Ins:ой # ;
+Det+Dem+Fem+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:ою # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Nom:и # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:и # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:их # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Gen:их # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Loc:их # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Dat:им # ;
+Det+Dem+MFN+Pl+Ins:ими # ;

LEXICON RelPron_мс-п_[п_a]
+Pron+Rel: LF_stem ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_[п_a]
+Det+Interr: LF_stem ;

LEXICON Rel_мс-п_[п_a]
+Det+Rel: LF_stem ;

LEXICON Indef_мс-п_[п_a]
+Det+Indef: LF_stem ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]
+Det: LF_stem ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]-либо
+Det+Indef: LF_stem-либо ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]-нибудь
+Det+Indef: LF_stem-нибудь ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]-то
+Det+Def: LF_stem-то ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]_Pl
+Det+MFN+Pl+Nom:%>ые # ;
+Det+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ые # ;
+Det+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:%>ых # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Gen:%>ых # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Loc:%>ых # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Dat:%>ым # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Ins:%>ыми # ;

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]_некий
+Det+Msc+Sg+Nom:ий # ;
+Det+Msc+Inan+Sg+Acc:ий # ;
+Det+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc:оего # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Loc:оем # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Ins:им # ;
! +Det+Msc+Sg+Ins:оим # ; ! устар.
+Det+Neu+Sg+Nom:ое # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Acc:ое # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Loc:оем # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Ins:им # ;
! +Det+Neu+Sg+Ins:оим # ; ! устар.
+Det+Fem+Sg+Nom:ая # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Acc:ую # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Gen:ой # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Gen+Use/NG:оей # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Loc:ой # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Loc+Use/NG:оей # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Dat:ой # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Dat+Use/NG:оей # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Ins:ой # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:ою # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:оей # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Ins+Use/NG:оею # ;
+Det+MFN+Pl+Nom:ие # ;
+Det+MFN+Inan+Pl+Acc:ие # ;
+Det+MFN+Anim+Pl+Acc:их # ;
! +Det+Anim+Pl+Acc:оих # ; ! устар.
+Det+MFN+Pl+Gen:их # ;
! +Det+Pl+Gen:оих # ; ! устар.
+Det+MFN+Pl+Loc:их # ;
! +Det+Pl+Loc:оих # ; ! устар.
+Det+MFN+Pl+Dat:им # ;
! +Det+Pl+Dat:оим # ; ! устар.
+Det+MFN+Pl+Ins:ими # ;
! +Det+Pl+Ins:оими # ; ! устар.

LEXICON мс-п_[п_a]_экий
+Det: LF_stem ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Gen:оего # ;
+Det+Msc+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
+Det+Neu+Sg+Dat:оему # ;
+Det+Fem+Sg+Nom:а # ;

LEXICON Interr_мс-п_[п_b]
+Det+Interr: LF_end ;
