src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON Pronoun
этот:э́т мс_этот ;
это:э́т мс_это ;
эти:э́т мс_эти ;
тот:т мс_тот ;
то:т мс_то ;
те:т мс_те ;
один:од%^Fи́н мс-п_один ; ! 1*b_%tr%_исх._форма_нерегул.;_мн._одни/,_и/х,_и/м;_Т._ед._м_и_с_одни/м ;
этот:э́т мс-п_этот ; ! 1a_%tr%_основа_косв._форм_эт;_мн._э/ти,_э/тих,_э/тим;_Т._ед._м,_с_э/тим;_см._также_стр._62 ;
тот:т мс-п_тот ; ! 1b_%tr%_основа_косв._форм_т;_мн._те,_тех,_тем;_Т._ед._м,_с_тем;_см._также_стр._62 ;
тот-то:т мс-п_тот-то ;
сам:са́м мс-п_сам ; ! 1f_%tr%_мн._са/ми,_сами/х,_сами/м;_Т._ед._м_и_с_сами/м;_В._ед._ж_саму/_//_устар._самоё; ;
сей:с мс-п_сей ; ! 2b_%tr%_исх._форма_нерегул.;_часть_форм_имеет_основу_си,_большинство_форм_—_основу_с;_см._стр._62 ;
самый:са́м мс-п_[п_a] ;
данный:да́нн мс-п_[п_a] ;
энный:э́нн мс-п_[п_a] ;
оный:о́н мс-п_[п_a] ;
который:кото́р Interr_мс-п_[п_a] ;
который:кото́р RelPron_мс-п_[п_a] ;
некоторый:не́котор Indef_мс-п_[п_a] ;
никоторый:никото́р мс-п_[п_a] ; ! § 12
каждый:ка́жд мс-п_[п_a] ; ! сочетается_только_с_сущ._в_ед._числе_(ка/ждый_де/нь),_с_pluralia_tantum_(см._стр._5;_ка/ждые_су/тки)_и_с_группами_из_числ._и_сущ._(ка/ждые_три/_дня/)
каковой:каков Interr_мс-п_[п_b] ;
ихний:и́хнь мс-п_[п_a] ;
эдакий:э́дак мс-п_[п_a] ;
этакий:э́так мс-п_[п_a] ;
разэтакий:разэ́так мс-п_[п_a] ;
каковский:како́вск Interr_мс-п_[п_a] ;
каковский:како́вск Rel_мс-п_[п_a] ;
таковский:тако́вск мс-п_[п_a] ;
всякий:вся́к мс-п_[п_a] ;
экий:э́к мс-п_[п_a]_экий ; ! %tr%_Р._ед._м,_с_э/кого_//_устар._э/коего,_Д._ед._м,_с_э/кому_//_устар._э/коему ;
некий:не́к мс-п_[п_a]_некий ; ! %tr%_часть_форм_образуется_от_основы_не/ко-;_см._стр._58 ;
многий:мно́г мс-п_[п_a]_Pl ; ! в_современном_языке_сочетается_только_с_сущ._во_мн._числе;_см._также_мно/гие,_мно/гое,_мно/го ;
немногий:немно́г мс-п_[п_a]_Pl ; ! в_современном_языке_сочетается_только_с_сущ._во_мн._числе;_см._также_немно/гие,_немно/гое,_немно/го ;
какой:как Interr_мс-п_[п_b] ;
прочий:про́ч мс-п_[п_a] ;
который-либо:кото́р мс-п_[п_a]-либо ;
который-нибудь:кото́р мс-п_[п_a]-нибудь ;
который-то:кото́р мс-п_[п_a]-то ;
